Utah statutes.
73-18-13.2.   Accident involving injury -- Stop at accident -- Penalty.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Reason to believe" means information from which a reasonable person would believe that the person may have been involved in an accident.

(b)  "Serious bodily injury" means bodily injury which involves a substantial risk of death, unconsciousness, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ, or mental faculty.

(2) (a)  The operator of a vessel who has reason to believe that the operator may have been involved in an accident resulting in injury to a person shall:

(i)  immediately stop the vessel at the scene of the accident or as close to it as safely possible; and

(ii)  remain at the scene of the accident until the operator has fulfilled the requirements of Section 73-18-13.

(b)  If the operator of a vessel has reason to believe the operator may have been involved in an accident only after leaving the scene of the accident, the operator shall immediately comply as nearly as possible with the requirements of Section 73-18-13.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a person who violates the provisions of Subsection (2):

(i)  is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the accident resulted in injury to any person; and

(ii)  shall be fined not less than $750.

(b)  A person who violates the provisions of Subsection (2):

(i)  is guilty of a third degree felony if the accident resulted in serious bodily injury to a person; and

(ii)  shall be fined not less than $750.



Enacted by Chapter 153, 2012 General Session

